incubator/apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
    <pardef n="rø/ra__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ra<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rir</l>
          <r>ra<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rdi</l>
          <r>ra<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rdu</l>
          <r>ra<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rt</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="r/ógva__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ógva</l>
          <r>ógva<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ógvi</l>
          <r>ógva<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øgvrur</l>
          <r>ógva<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óði</l>
          <r>ógva<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óðu</l>
          <r>ógva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óð</l>
          <r>ógva<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/vera__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ert</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eru</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>var</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vart</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vóru</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Supine ? -->
      <e> 
        <p>
          <l>verið</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vera</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="k/unna__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anst</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnu</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undi</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undu</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnað</l>
          <r>unna<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="v/erða__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erða</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erði</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erður</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erða</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arð</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arðst</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>órðu</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erðið</l>
          <r>erða<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="bl/íva__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íva</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ívi</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ívur</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íva</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiv</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eivst</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivu</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivið</l>
          <r>íva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="h/ava__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ava</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avi</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evur</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ava</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evði</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øvdu</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avt</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="árna__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ð</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ði</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ðu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ður</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vera"><i/><par n="/vera__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hava"><i>h</i><par n="h/ava__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verða"><i>v</i><par n="v/erða__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blíva"><i>bl</i><par n="bl/íva__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kunna"><i>k</i><par n="k/unna__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="munna"><i>m</i><par n="k/unna__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="rógva"><i>r</i><par n="r/ógva__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="røra"><i>rø</i><par n="rø/ra__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anda"><i>anda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="árna"><i>árna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ávara"><i>ávara</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avblomstra"><i>avblomstra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avhenda"><i>avhenda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avmarka"><i>avmarka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avskriva"><i>avskriva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="balsamera"><i>balsamera</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="banda"><i>banda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bara"><i>bara</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bjarga"><i>bjarga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blaka"><i>blaka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brotna"><i>brotna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bumba"><i>bumba</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="daga"><i>daga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dálka"><i>dálka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="degna"><i>degna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drukna"><i>drukna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eikimála"><i>eikimála</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erva"><i>erva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fána"><i>fána</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fjasa"><i>fjasa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flokka"><i>flokka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fona"><i>fona</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="freista"><i>freista</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grisa"><i>grisa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hækka"><i>hækka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="halga"><i>halga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="heiðra"><i>heiðra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hjúka"><i>hjúka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="huga"><i>huga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="innstilla"><i>innstilla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="javna"><i>javna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kjósa"><i>kjósa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kóka"><i>kóka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="krógva"><i>krógva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="laga"><i>laga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lógartryggja"><i>lógartryggja</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mála"><i>mála</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="máta"><i>máta</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="miðsavna"><i>miðsavna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ofra"><i>ofra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prenta"><i>prenta</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reinsa"><i>reinsa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rulla"><i>rulla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sakna"><i>sakna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="savna"><i>savna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skelka"><i>skelka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skipa"><i>skipa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slátra"><i>slátra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spotta"><i>spotta</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stranda"><i>stranda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sveipa"><i>sveipa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tarna"><i>tarna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tilskriva"><i>tilskriva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="travalja"><i>travalja</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trumla"><i>trumla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tváa"><i>tváa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umhugsa"><i>umhugsa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="útskriva"><i>útskriva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vara"><i>vara</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="versna"><i>versna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yvirhála"><i>yvirhála</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
